Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-910.01
Retirement
system; participation.

(1) Each person employed by a
public school who is a school employee and
who is qualified to participate in the retirement system shall
participate in the retirement system.

(2) Public schools shall ensure that all school employees
who qualify for participation pursuant to this section shall begin annual
participation on July 1 of each plan year or upon such person's date of hire,
if later than July 1, and that all required deposits are made on behalf of
such employees.

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 26;

Laws 2010, LB950, § 12.